Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
185

LAND FIRE
PROTECTION LAW

Section

185-1 Definitions

185-1.5 Responsible agency

185-2 Administrator and managers

185-3 Powers and duties of the administrator and
managers

185-4 Payment for firefighting

185-5 Rates of pay for firefighting

185-6 Insurance protection

185-7 Fire danger periods, burning permits,
setting fires,

penalties

185-8 Government agencies to assist

185-9 Obstructing the administrator or managers;
penalty

185-10 Renumbered

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8 purports to amend this chapter.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next